Illinois, session 104th, HB5587.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Act is amended by 5adding Section 47 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2610/47 new)7    Sec. 47. Persistent domestic violence offender registry.8    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section:9    "Conviction" has the meaning given to that term in Section 102-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.11    "Domestic abuse victim" means any family or household 12member who is a victim of abuse as defined in Section 103 of 13the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986. 14    "Persistent domestic violence offender" means a person 15who:16        (1) has been convicted in this State of an offense 17    committed against a domestic abuse victim; and18        (2) has at least one prior conviction for an offense 19    committed against a domestic abuse victim.20    "Prior conviction" means a conviction for an offense 21occurring prior to the commission of the offense for which the 22defendant is being sentenced. 23    (b) There is created within the Illinois State Police a   HB5587- 2 -LRB104 17849 RLC 31283 b1registry of persistent domestic violence offenders.2    (c) The Illinois State Police shall maintain the registry 3created under subsection (b) based upon information supplied 4to the Illinois State Police by court clerks under subsections 5(d) and (e) and information available to the Illinois State 6Police from the Department of Corrections and local law 7enforcement agencies. The Illinois State Police shall make the 8registry available for public inquiry on the Internet.9    (d) The registry must consist of the persistent domestic 10violence offender's name, date of birth, conviction date, 11county of convictions, and a current photograph of the 12persistent domestic violence offender. The court clerk shall 13provide the Illinois State Police with a copy of the 14persistent domestic violence offender's driver license, if it 15is available after reasonable inquiry, or other State or 16federal identification, and other identifying data the 17Illinois State Police determines is necessary to properly 18identify the persistent domestic violence offender and exclude 19innocent persons. However, the registry available for public 20inquiry must not include the persistent domestic violence 21offender's address, social security number, driver license 22number, or any other State or federal identification number.23    (e)(1) If a person is convicted of an offense committed 24against a domestic abuse victim and the person convicted has 25at least one prior conviction for an offense committed against 26a domestic abuse victim, then the court shall, upon proof of   HB5587- 3 -LRB104 17849 RLC 31283 b1any prior convictions committed against a domestic abuse 2victim, order the person to register as a persistent domestic 3violence offender under this Section.4    (2) If a court orders a defendant to register under this 5Section, then the court clerk shall forward to the Illinois 6State Police a certified copy of the qualifying conviction and 7the date of birth of the defendant. The court clerk shall 8forward the information to the Illinois State Police within 7 9days of the date of the conviction.10    (f) Notwithstanding any other law and in addition to any 11other punishment that may be imposed for a conviction of the 12offense, a defendant required to register under this Section 13must be assessed a registration fee in the amount of $150, 14which must be paid to the clerk of the court imposing the 15sentence, who shall:16        (1) retain $50 of the fee for the administration of 17    this Section, which must be reserved for the purposes 18    authorized by this Section at the end of each fiscal year; 19    and20        (2) remit $100 of the fee to the Illinois Criminal 21    Justice Information Authority for the purpose of 22    administering grants to fund family violence prevention 23    and intervention services. These funds shall not revert to 24    the General Revenue Fund at the end of the fiscal year and 25    must be carried forward for the purposes authorized by 26    this paragraph.  HB5587- 4 -LRB104 17849 RLC 31283 b1    (g) The Illinois State Police shall remove from the 2registry the name and other identifying information of a 3persistent domestic violence offender required to register 4under this Section:5        (1) 5 years after the date of the most recent 6    conviction for an offense committed against a domestic 7    abuse victim if the defendant has one prior conviction for 8    an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim;9        (2) 7 years after the date of the most recent 10    conviction for an offense committed against a domestic 11    abuse victim if the defendant has 2 prior convictions for 12    an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim;13        (3) 10 years after the date of the most recent 14    conviction for an offense committed against a domestic 15    abuse victim if the defendant has 3 prior convictions for 16    an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim; and17        (4) 20 years after the date of the most recent 18    conviction for an offense committed against a domestic 19    abuse victim if the defendant has 4 or more prior 20    convictions for an offense committed against a domestic 21    abuse victim.22    (h) This Section applies only to persons convicted of an 23offense committed against a domestic abuse victim that 24occurred on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 25of the 104th General Assembly; however, a prior conviction is 26not required to occur on or after the effective date of this   HB5587- 5 -LRB104 17849 RLC 31283 b1amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.